th: ประเภทคอแซกโซโฟน: คอแบบปรับได้(มุม/การหมุน); คอแบบถอดได้; คอแบบติดตาย; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 薩克斯風彎管類型: 可調式吹管 (角度 / 旋轉); 可拆式吹管; 固定式吹管; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de pescoço do saxofone: Tudel ajustável (ângulo/rotação); Tudel amovível; Tudel fixo; Outro
tr: Saksafon boyun tipi: Ayarlanabilir boyun (açı/dönüş); Çıkarılabilir boyun; Sabit boyun; Diğer
de: Typ des Saxophonhalses: Verstellbarer S-Bogen (Winkel/Rotation); Abnehmbarer S-Bogen; Fester S-Bogen; Sonstige
sv: Saxofon – typ av hals: Justerbar hals (vinkel/rotation); Avtagbar hals; Fast hals; Övrigt
fr: Type de bocal du saxophone: Bocal réglable (angle/rotation); Bocal détachable; Bocal fixe; Autre
nb: Saksofonhalstype: Justerbar hals (vinkel/rotasjon); Avtakbar hals; Fast hals; Annet
ru: Тип S-образной трубки саксофона: Регулируемая эса (угол/поворот); Съемная эса; Фиксированная эса; Другая
pl: Typ fajki saksofonu: Regulowana fajka (kąt/obrót); Zdejmowana fajka; Stała fajka; Inna
en: Saxophone neck type: Adjustable neck (angle/rotation); Detachable neck; Fixed neck; Other
it: Tipo di collo del sassofono: Chiver regolabile (angolo/rotazione); Chiver staccabile; Chiver fisso; Altro
sl-SI: Vrsta vratu saksofona: Prilagodljiv vrat (kot/vrtenje); Snemljiv vrat; Fiksen vrat; Drugo
nl: Saxofoon hals type: Verstelbare hals (hoek/rotatie); Afneembare hals; Vaste hals; Overige
hu: Szaxofon nyakának típusa: Állítható nyak (dőlésszög/forgás); Levehető nyak; Fix nyak; Egyéb
el: Τύπος λαιμού σαξοφώνου: Ρυθμιζόμενος λαιμός (γωνία/περιστροφή); Αποσπώμενος λαιμός; Σταθερός λαιμός; Άλλο
da: Saxofonhalstype: Justerbar hals (vinkel/rotation); Aftagelig hals; Fast hals; Andet
zh-CN: 萨克斯管弯脖类型: 可调节脖管（角度/旋转）; 可拆卸脖管; 固定脖管; 其他
bg-BG: Тип гриф на саксофон: Регулируема ес-тръба (ъгъл/въртене); Подвижна ес-тръба; Фиксирана ес-тръба; Друго
vi: Loại cổ kèn saxophone: Cổ có thể điều chỉnh (góc/xoay); Cổ có thể tháo rời; Cổ cố định; Khác
lt-LT: Saksofono kaklelio tipas: Reguliuojamas kaklelis (kampas / sukimasis); Nuimamas kaklelis; Fiksuotas kaklelis; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta vrata saksofona: Podesiv vrat (kut/rotacija); Odvojiv vrat; Fiksni vrat; Ostalo
pt-BR: Saxofone tipo de tudel: Tudel ajustável (ângulo/rotação); Tudel removível; Tudel fixo; Outros
ko: 색소폰 넥 유형: 조절식 넥(각도/회전); 탈착식 넥; 고정식 넥; 기타
cs: Typ krku saxofonu: Nastavitelné eso (úhel/rotace); Odnímatelné eso; Pevné eso; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ krku saxofónu: Nastaviteľné eso (uhol/rotácia); Odnímateľné eso; Pevné eso; Iné
es: Tipo de cuello del saxofón: Tudel ajustable (ángulo/rotación); Tudel desmontable; Tudel fijo; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul gâtului de saxofon: Gât ajustabil (unghi/rotație); Gât detașabil; Gât fix; Altele
ja: サックスのネックタイプ: アジャスタブルネック (角度 / 回転); デタッチャブルネック; 一体型ネック; その他
fi: Saksofonin kaulan tyyppi: Säädettävä kaula (kulma/kierto); Irrotettava kaula; Kiinteä kaula; Muu